District of Columbia statutes.
8-634.10

Statute of limitations.

(a)

The provisions of § 12-301(10) notwithstanding, an action by or on behalf of the Mayor to recover the cost of a response action under this section must be commenced within 6 years after the initiation of physical onsite response work.

(b)

An action to compel the Mayor or another person to perform a duty brought under this section shall be commenced within 2 years after the date that the duty became nondiscretionary.

June 13, 2001, D.C. Law 13-312, § 410
as added Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-369, § 2(k), 58 DCR 996
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(k) of Brownfield Revitalization Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-667, December 28, 2010, 58 DCR 95).